apertium-es-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="finančn/í__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ějš</l>
          <r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="každ/ý__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="každ/ý__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nov/ý__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ějš</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chyt/rý__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ří</l>
          <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ří</l>
          <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>řějš</l>
          <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="če/ský__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ští</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ští</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sk</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sko</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sky</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="po"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>štějš</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="evrop/ský__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ští</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ští</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sk</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sko</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>štějš</l>
          <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="víkendov/ý__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="exotermi/cký__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čtí</l>
          <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čtí</l>
          <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ck</l>
          <r>cký<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cko</l>
          <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čtějš</l>
          <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="dalš/í__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="novouč/ký__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cí</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cí</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cel/ý__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nový"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nej__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nej</l>
          <r>nej<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="každý"><i>každ</i><par n="každ/ý__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="každý"><i>každ</i><par n="každ/ý__det"/></e>
    <e lm="finanční"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>finančn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="úřední"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>úředn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jarní"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jarn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mezinárodní"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>mezinárodn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="národnostní"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>národnostn</i><par n="finančn/í__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>nov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svatý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>svat</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jasný"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jasn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="novoučký"><p><l>novouč</l><r>nový</r></p><par n="novouč/ký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chytrý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>chyt</i><par n="chyt/rý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="evropský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>evrop</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>dán</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jihoslovanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jihoslovan</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jizerský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>jizer</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="afgánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>afgán</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arabský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>arab</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aramejský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>aramej</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="argentinský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>argentin</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arménský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>armén</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="asijský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>asij</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="australský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>austral</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="barbarský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>barbar</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baškirský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>baškir</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="běloruský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>běloru</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bengálský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>bengál</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bílský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>bíl</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brazilský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>brazil</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="britský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>brit</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bulharský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>bulhar</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="český"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>če</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chorvatský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>chorvat</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="čínský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>čín</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="egyptský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>egypt</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="faerský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>faer</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="finský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>fin</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="francouzský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>francouz</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hebrejský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>hebrej</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="holandský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>holand</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indiánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>indián</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indonéský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>indoné</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="italský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>ital</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="japonský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>japon</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="keltský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kelt</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klingonský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>klingon</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="královský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>králov</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="křesťanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>křesťan</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kurdský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>kurd</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="latinský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>latin</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="litevský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>litev</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lotyšský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>lotyš</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malajský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>malaj</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mongolský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>mongol</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mořský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>moř</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="norský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>nor</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="otcovský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>otcov</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="partyzánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>partyzán</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="portugalský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>portugal</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proletářský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>proletář</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rakouský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>rakou</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="římský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>řím</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rumunský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>rumun</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ruský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>ru</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="satanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>satan</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slovanský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>slovan</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="španělský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>španěl</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="srbský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>srb</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="švýcarský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>švýcar</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vegetariánský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>vegetarián</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="velšský"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>velš</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="typický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>typi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="exotermický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>exotermi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="demokratický"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>demokrati</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="víkendový"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>víkendov</i><par n="víkendov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spravedlivý"><par n="nej__adv"/><i>spravedliv</i><par n="víkendov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="celý"><i>cel</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
